Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1420
Filed, filer, and filing official; defined.

(1) Filed shall mean the receipt by the appropriate filing official of a statement or report required to be filed under the Nebraska Political Accountability and Disclosure Act.

(2) Filer shall mean each person required to file a statement or report pursuant to the act.

(3) Filing official shall mean the official designated pursuant to the act to receive required statements and reports.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 20;

Laws 2005, LB 242, § 6.